Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.010

Department created.

A state department of financial institutions, headed by the director of financial institutions, is created. The department shall be organized and operated in a manner that to the fullest extent permissible under applicable law protects the public interest, protects the safety and soundness of depository institutions and entities under the jurisdiction of the department, ensures access to the regulatory process for all concerned parties, and protects the interests of investors. The department of financial institutions shall be structured to reflect the unique differences in the types of institutions and areas it regulates.

[ 1993 c 472 s 2.]